Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. PUBLIC SAFETY ââ FIRE FIGHTER TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION. By January 1, 2026, the department of public safety shall revise the rules relating to fire fighter training and certification to provide that a person who committed any crime as an adult that resulted in the requirement that the person be listed on a sex offender registry shall not be certified as a fire fighter, and shall not serve as a noncertified fire fighter or volunteer fire fighter. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 793, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor